apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="/sprießen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>sprießend</l> <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprieße</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprieße</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprieße</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießest</l> <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießet</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprieß</l>    <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießten</l> <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießten</l> <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießten</l> <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießten</l> <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießte</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießte</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießte</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießte</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießtest</l><r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießtest</l><r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießtet</l> <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießtet</l> <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießt</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießt</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießt</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprießt</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprossen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sproßen</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprossen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sproßen</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprössen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprössen</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprösse</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprösse</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprössest</l> <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprösset</l>  <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>spross</l>    <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sproß</l>     <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>spross</l>    <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sproß</l>     <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprosst</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sproßt</l>    <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprosst</l>   <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sproßt</l>    <r>sprießen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/springen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>sprangen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprangen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprängen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprängen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>spränge</l>   <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>spränge</l>   <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprängest</l> <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>spränget</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprang</l>    <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprang</l>    <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprangst</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sprangt</l>   <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springend</l> <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springen</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springe</l>   <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springe</l>   <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springe</l>   <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springest</l> <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springet</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>spring</l>    <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springst</l>  <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springt</l>   <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springt</l>   <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>springt</l>   <r>springen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="sprießen">        <i></i><par n="/sprießen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="springen">        <i></i><par n="/springen__vblex"/></e>
